Illinois, session 104th, SB3433.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Seizure and Forfeiture Reporting Act is 5amended by changing Section 5 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 810/5)7    Sec. 5. Applicability. This Act is applicable to property 8seized or forfeited under the following provisions of law:9        (1) Section 3.23 of the Illinois Food, Drug and 10    Cosmetic Act;11        (2) Section 44.1 of the Environmental Protection Act;12        (3) Section 105-55 of the Herptiles-Herps Act;13        (4) Section 1-215 of the Fish and Aquatic Life Code;14        (5) Section 1.25 of the Wildlife Code;15        (6) Section 17-10.6 of the Criminal Code of 2012 16    (financial institution fraud);17        (7) Section 28-5 of the Criminal Code of 2012 18    (gambling);19        (8) Article 29B of the Criminal Code of 2012 (money 20    laundering);21        (9) Article 33G of the Criminal Code of 2012 (Illinois 22    Street Gang and Racketeer Influenced And Corrupt 23    Organizations Law);  SB3433- 2 -LRB104 19089 BDA 34059 b1        (10) Article 36 of the Criminal Code of 2012 (seizure 2    and forfeiture of vessels, vehicles, and aircraft);3        (11) Section 47-15 of the Criminal Code of 2012 4    (dumping garbage upon real property);5        (12) Article 124B of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 6    1963 (forfeiture);7        (13) the Drug Asset Forfeiture Procedure Act;8        (14) the Narcotics Profit Forfeiture Act;9        (15) the Illinois Streetgang Terrorism Omnibus 10    Prevention Act;11        (16) the Illinois Securities Law of 1953;12        (17) the Archaeological and Paleontological Resources 13    Protection Act;14        (18) the Human Remains Protection Act; and 15        (19) Section 16 of the Timber Buyers Licensing Act; 16    and . 17        (20) the Ginseng Harvesting Act. 18(Source: P.A. 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 103-218, eff. 1-1-24; 19103-446, eff. 8-4-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 20    Section 10. The Ginseng Harvesting Act is amended by 21changing Sections 1, 2a, 2b, 2c, 4, and 6 and by adding Section 227 as follows: 23    (525 ILCS 20/1)  (from Ch. 61, par. 501)24    Sec. 1. Definitions. As used in this Act, unless the   SB3433- 3 -LRB104 19089 BDA 34059 b1context otherwise requires:2    "Cultivated ginseng" means ginseng growing in tilled beds 3under shade of artificial structures. 4    "Department" means the Department of Natural Resources. 5    "Ginseng" means the root of the American ginseng plant 6(Panax quinquefolium). "Ginseng" includes, but is not limited 7to, the roots, rhizomes, leaves, and seeds of the American 8ginseng plant, which may be cultivated or wild. "Ginseng" does 9not include those parts of the American ginseng plant that 10have been processed.11    "Green ginseng" means a root of ginseng from which the 12moisture has not been removed by drying. In this Act, the 13amount of dried ginseng rhizome that can be derived from green 14ginseng rhizome may be calculated using a ratio of 3.3 to one 15by weight.16    "Grower" means a person who grows cultivated ginseng for 17the purpose of selling the ginseng.18    "Harvester" means any person who harvests, possesses, 19transports, cuts, gathers, destroys, digs, or uproots wild 20ginseng for the purpose of selling the ginseng or for personal 21use.22    "Root" means the ginseng rhizome and its roots. 23    "Wild ginseng" means ginseng in, or collected from, its 24natural habitat, notwithstanding whether the ginseng is native 25to that habitat or was introduced or increased in abundance by 26sowing ginseng seed or by transplanting ginseng plants from   SB3433- 4 -LRB104 19089 BDA 34059 b1other areas. 2(Source: P.A. 83-680.) 3    (525 ILCS 20/2a)  (from Ch. 61, par. 508)4    Sec. 2a. Harvest License. No person may cut, root up, 5gather or harvest wild ginseng, or attempt to do so, unless the 6person has a harvest license issued by the Department. All 7persons licensed by the Department pursuant to this Section 8shall immediately produce the license when requested to do so 9by an officer or authorized employee of the Department or any 10sheriff, deputy sheriff, or other peace officer. The fee for a 11harvest license is $7 and is valid from April 1 to March 31. A 12harvest license is valid during the established harvest season 13for wild ginseng for the year during which it is issued. The 14Department shall establish by administrative rule the 15procedure for issuing licenses and regulations on the methods 16used to harvest. Harvested wild ginseng may be sold only to 17dealers licensed by the State of Illinois. All wild ginseng 18must be sold by harvesters no later than March 1 of the year 19following harvest.20(Source: P.A. 85-152.) 21    (525 ILCS 20/2b)  (from Ch. 61, par. 509)22    Sec. 2b. Grower's License. Any person engaged in the 23propagation and harvesting of cultivated ginseng shall secure 24a registered grower's license from the Department annually for   SB3433- 5 -LRB104 19089 BDA 34059 b1a fee of $25.00. A grower's license shall authorize the 2harvest of cultivated ginseng at any time. A grower's license 3is valid from April 1 through March 31. A grower shall maintain 4records as to the location of all cultivated ginseng fields, 5areas or facilities, quantity of ginseng produced and any 6other information required by the Department by administrative 7rule and shall keep records and make reports to the Department 8as required by administrative rule. The Department shall 9establish by administrative rule procedures of issuing 10licenses, keeping records and reports, reporting transactions 11and certifying the amounts, quantities and origin of the 12cultivated ginseng. The Department shall supply, free of 13additional charges proper forms to growers for all required 14data and information. All persons licensed by the Department 15pursuant to this Section shall immediately produce the license 16when requested to do so by an officer or authorized employee of 17the Department or any sheriff, deputy sheriff, or other peace 18officer. 19(Source: P.A. 83-680.) 20    (525 ILCS 20/2c)  (from Ch. 61, par. 510)21    Sec. 2c. Dealer License. No person shall be engaged in the 22business of buying wild or cultivated ginseng from harvesters, 23growers or other dealers for resale to exporters or to other 24dealers unless the person has a license issued by the 25Department to be a dealer of ginseng. The fee for a dealer's   SB3433- 6 -LRB104 19089 BDA 34059 b1license is $50.00 for Illinois residents and $100.00 for 2nonresidents and is valid from April 1 through March 31. A 3dealer shall maintain records, open to duly authorized agents 4of the Department, of the quantity of material purchased and 5sold, the county where purchased ginseng was harvested, and 6other information required by the Department by administrative 7rule, and shall make reports to the Department as required. 8The Department shall establish by administrative rule 9procedures for issuing licenses, keeping records, reporting 10transactions, and certifying the origin of ginseng. The 11Department shall supply free of additional charge, proper 12forms to dealers for all required data and information. A 13dealer may purchase roots of wild ginseng harvested in 14Illinois only during the period from two weeks after the 15opening of the harvest season for wild ginseng to the 16following March 1, or may purchase at any time wild or 17cultivated ginseng harvested in another state and certified 18for export by that state. All persons licensed by the 19Department pursuant to this Section shall immediately produce 20the license when requested to do so by an officer or authorized 21employee of the Department or any sheriff, deputy sheriff, or 22other peace officer. 23(Source: P.A. 84-1065.) 24    (525 ILCS 20/4)  (from Ch. 61, par. 516)25    Sec. 4. Trespass to Harvest Ginseng. No person shall,   SB3433- 7 -LRB104 19089 BDA 34059 b1without permission of the owner, enter the forest, field, 2yard, building, garden or other enclosure of another and 3willfully break down, dig, destroy, take or carry away any 4ginseng or attempt to do so.5(Source: P.A. 83-680.) 6    (525 ILCS 20/6)7    Sec. 6. Additional license revocation and denial 8provisions. 9    (a) If a license has been issued to any person under this 10Act and that person is found guilty of any misrepresentation 11in obtaining that license or a violation of any of the 12provisions of this Act or its rules or a violation of the 13United States Code that involves the possession, use, sale, 14transportation, or harvesting of ginseng when any part of the 15United States Code violation occurred in Illinois, the license 16may be revoked by the Department. The Department may also 17refuse to issue any license to that person and may suspend that 18person from engaging in any activity requiring the license for 19a period of time in accordance with rules adopted by the 20Department not to exceed 5 years following the revocation.21    (b) If a person who has not been issued a license under 22this Act is found guilty of a violation of any of the 23provisions of this Act or its rules or a violation of the 24United States Code that involves the possession, use, sale, 25transportation, or harvesting of ginseng when any part of the   SB3433- 8 -LRB104 19089 BDA 34059 b1United States Code violation occurred in Illinois, the 2Department may refuse to issue any license to that person and 3may suspend that person from engaging in any activity 4requiring the license for a period of time in accordance with 5rules adopted by the Department not to exceed 5 years.6    (c) The Department's license revocation procedures must be 7established by administrative rule.8    (d) Any person who violates any of the provisions of this 9Act or its rules during any period when his or her license is 10revoked or denied by virtue of this Section, or during the time 11he or she is suspended under subsection (b), is guilty of a 12Class A misdemeanor.13    (e) A person whose license to engage in any activity 14regulated under this Act has been suspended or revoked may 15not, during the period of the suspension or revocation or 16until obtaining the proper license, (i) be in the company of 17any person engaging in the activity covered by the license or 18(ii) serve as a guide or facilitator for a person who is 19engaged or prepared to engage in the activity covered by the 20license.21(Source: P.A. 102-837, eff. 5-13-22.) 22    (525 ILCS 20/7 new)23    Sec. 7. Forfeiture and seizure. Any device or equipment, 24including vehicles and conveyances, used or operated in 25violation of this Act or rules adopted under this Act or   SB3433- 9 -LRB104 19089 BDA 34059 b1attempted to be used in violation of this Act or rules adopted 2under this Act shall be deemed a public nuisance and subject to 3the seizure and confiscation by any authorized employee of the 4Department. Upon the seizure of such item, the Department 5shall take and hold the device or equipment until disposed of 6as provided under this Section.7    Upon the seizure of any property under this Section, the 8authorized employee of the Department making such seizure 9shall immediately cause a complaint to be filed before the 10circuit court and a summons to be issued requiring the person 11who illegally used or operated or attempted to use or operate 12such property and the owner and person in possession of such 13property to appear in court and show cause why the property 14seized should not be forfeited to the State. Upon the return of 15the summons duly served or other notice under this Section, 16the court shall proceed to determine the question of the 17illegality of the use of the seized property and upon judgment 18being entered to the effect that such property was illegally 19used, an order may be entered providing for the forfeiture of 20such seized property to the Department and shall upon entry of 21the order become the property of the Department. However, the 22owner of the property may have a jury determine the illegality 23of its use, and shall have the right to an appeal, as in other 24cases. A confiscation or forfeiture under this Section shall 25not preclude or mitigate against prosecution and assessment of 26penalties otherwise provided in this Act.  SB3433- 10 -LRB104 19089 BDA 34059 b1    Upon seizure of any property under circumstances 2supporting a reasonable belief that the property was 3abandoned, lost, or stolen or otherwise illegally possessed or 4used contrary to the provisions of this Act, except property 5seized during a search or arrest and ultimately returned, 6destroyed, or otherwise disposed of pursuant to order of a 7court in accordance with this Act, the authorized employee of 8the Department shall make reasonable inquiry and efforts to 9identify and notify the owner or other person entitled to 10possession of it and shall return the property after the 11person provides reasonable and satisfactory proof of ownership 12or right to possession and reimburses the Department for all 13reasonable expenses of such custody. If the identity or 14location of the owner or other person entitled to possession 15of the property has not been ascertained within 6 months after 16the Department obtains such possession, the Department shall 17effectuate the sale of the property for cash to the highest 18bidder at a public auction. The owner or other person entitled 19to possession of such property may claim and recover 20possession of the property at any time before its sale at 21public auction, upon providing reasonable and satisfactory 22proof of ownership or right of possession and reimbursing the 23Department for all reasonable expenses of custody thereof.24    Any property forfeited to the State by court order 25pursuant to this Section may be disposed of by public auction, 26except that any property that is the subject of such a court   SB3433- 11 -LRB104 19089 BDA 34059 b1order shall not be disposed of pending appeal of the order. The 2proceeds of the sales at auction shall be deposited into the 3Wildlife and Fish Fund.4    The Department shall pay all costs of notices required by 5this Section. Property seized or forfeited under this Section 6is subject to reporting under Section 5 of the Seizure and 7Forfeiture Reporting Act. 8    (525 ILCS 20/1a rep.)9    (525 ILCS 20/1b rep.)10    (525 ILCS 20/1c rep.)11    (525 ILCS 20/1d rep.)12    (525 ILCS 20/1e rep.)13    Section 15. The Ginseng Harvesting Act is amended by 14repealing Sections 1a, 1b, 1c, 1d, and 1e.